Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2459
Administer, defined.

Administer means to directly apply a drug or device by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or other means to the body of a patient or research subject.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 3.